Utah statutes.
58-37a-6.   Seizure -- Forfeiture -- Property rights.

Drug paraphernalia is subject to seizure and forfeiture in accordance with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.

